Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-414
Reports and receiving of prisoners.

(1) No provost marshal, commander of a guard, warden, keeper or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary or prison designated by the Governor or the Adjutant General under section 55-413 shall refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his charge by an officer of the military forces, when the committing officer furnishes a statement signed by him, of the offense charged against the prisoner.

(2) Every commander of a guard, warden, keeper or officer of a city or county jail or any other jail, penitentiary or prison designated by the Governor or the Adjutant General under section 55-413 to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four hours after such commitment or as soon as he is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer the name of such prisoner, the offense charged against him, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 14, p. 1557.